Maryland, session 2026, SB0225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–503.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0225*

SENATE BILL 225
(c) (1) The Department, by regulation, may designate interjurisdictional
watersheds in which any impoundment proposal is subject to review and approval by the
Department for standards relating to safety and flood control.
(2) Gwynns Falls, Jones Falls, and Herring Run, situated in or adjacent to
Baltimore City, are designated interjurisdictional watersheds.
5–803.
(d) (1) (I) By July 1, 1990 each subdivision, in cooperation with the
Departments of the Environment and Agriculture, the Department of Planning, and other
appropriate State agencies, shall prepare a flood management plan based upon an
evaluation of the alternative management techniques and other findings included in
studies conducted under subsection (b) of this section.
(II) Each flood management plan shall be consistent with the
purposes and provisions of this subtitle.
(2) Management techniques may include:
(i) Flood control dams;
(ii) Levees and dikes;
(iii) Stormwater detention or retention structures;
(iv) Public acquisition;
(v) Flood proofing;
(vi) Storm drain and stream maintenance;
(vii) Tax adjustment policies;
(viii) Subdivision, zoning, and related ordinances; and
(ix) Other practical methods.
(3) Management techniques shall include flood warning systems.
(e) (1) (I) In any interjurisdictional watershed, those portions of the flood
management plans of the subdivisions relating to the watershed shall be subject to review
and approval by the Department as one plan.
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMAR 26.17.02.07 AND § 5–503
OF THIS TITLE, THE FOLLOWING WATERSHEDS AND ALL THEIR HEADWATERS AND

SENATE BILL 225 3
TRIBUTARIES ARE DESIGNATED AS INTERJURISDICTIONAL FLOOD HAZARD
WATERSHEDS:
1. CARROLL CREEK IN FREDERICK CITY AND
FREDERICK COUNTY;
2. GWYNNS FALLS IN BALTIMORE CITY AND
BALTIMORE COUNTY;
3. JONES FALLS IN BALTIMORE CITY AND BALTIMORE
COUNTY; AND
4. HERRING RUN IN BALTIMORE CITY AND BALTIMORE
COUNTY.
(III) IN ADDITION TO THE WATERSHEDS SPECIFIED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGNATE
THE PATAPSCO RIVER, INCLUDING ALL HEADWATERS AND TRIBUTARIES IN
BALTIMORE CITY, BALTIMORE COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, CARROLL COUNTY,
AND ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY, AS AN INTERJURISDICTIONAL FLOOD HAZARD
WATERSHED.
(2) (I) Any comprehensive flood management plan which includes a
project for which grant funds are requested under this section is subject to review and
approval by the Department.
(II) If a plan is disapproved, the Secretary shall set forth in writing
the reason for disapproval.
(III) Disapproval of a plan shall be based only on flood management
considerations.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.